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DTC P0773/64 Shift Solenoid E Electrical Malfunction
(SL Solenoid Valve)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

TheSLsolenoidvalve is turnedONandOFFbysignals fromtheEngineandECTECU(2UZ −FE, 1FZ−FE)
orECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE) tocontrol thehydraulicpressureactingon the lock −uprelayvalve,
which thencontrolsoperationof the lock −upclutch.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0773/64

Either (a)or (b) isdetected for 1 time.
(a)Solenoid resistance is8 � or less (short circuit)when the
solenoid isenergized.
(b)Solenoid resistance is 100k � ormore (opencircuit)when
the solenoid is not energized.

SOpenorshort inSLsolenoidvalvecircuit
SSLsolenoidvalve
SEngineandECTECU(2UZ −FE, 1FZ−FE)
SECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE)

Fail safe function
If the Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU detects a malfunction, it turns the SL solenoid valve OFF.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Measure resistance between terminal SL of Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU
and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO−1 27).
(b) Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU or

ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal SL of Engine and ECT
ECU or ECT ECU and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)

OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU or
ECT ECU (See page IN−35).
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2 Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU and
automatic transmission solenoid connector.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the solenoid connector from the transmission.
CHECK:
Check the harness between terminal SL of Engine and ECT
ECU or ECT ECU and terminal SL of transmission solenoid
connector.
OK:

There is no open or short circuit.
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NG Repair or replace the harness or connector.

OK

3 Check SL solenoid valve.

Electrical Check:
PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.
(d) Remove the SL solenoid valve.
CHECK:
(a) Measure resistance between terminal SL of solenoid

valve and solenoid body.
(b) Connect positive¨ lead of the battery to terminal of sole-

noid connector, negative© lead of the battery to solenoid
body.

OK:
(a) Resistance: 11 − 15 � at 20 ˚C (68 ˚F)
(b) The SL solenoid valve makes operating noise.

Mechanical Check:
PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.
(d) Remove the SL solenoid valve.
CHECK:
(a) Applying 490 kPa (5 kgf/cm2, 71 psi) of compressed air,

check that the solenoid valve opens.
(b) When battery positive voltage is supplied to the solenoid

valve, check that the solenoid valve does not leak air.
OK:

(a) Solenoid valve opens
(b) Solenoid valve does not leak air

NG Replace the SL solenoid valve.

OK

Repair or replace the solenoid wire.


